Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DEVELOPING MARKETS FOR OATS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $450,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of agriculture to improve soil health and water quality by reducing erosion and nitrate leaching through awarding grants to farmers, aggregators, and processors in Minnesota that will make investments in infrastructure or equipment for cultivating, harvesting, processing, storing, transporting, wholesaling, or distributing oats. This appropriation is exempt from the income repayment requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10, paragraph (c). new text end